Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,275
Radar transmission device; operation; possession; unlawful; violation; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any person to operate or possess any radar transmission device while operating a motor vehicle on any highway in this state. Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a Class IIIA misdemeanor.

Laws 1982, LB 32, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,205;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 371.